Utah statutes.
49-20-404.   Governors' and legislative benefit.

(1)  The state shall pay the percentage described in Subsection (3) of the cost of providing paid-up group health coverage policy for members and their surviving spouses covered under Chapter 19, Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Act who:

(a)  retire after January 1, 1998;

(b)  are at least 62 but less than 65 years of age;

(c)  elect to receive and apply for this benefit to the program; and

(d)  are active members at the time of retirement or have continued coverage with the program until the date of eligibility for the benefit under this Subsection (1).

(2)  The state shall pay the  percentage described in Subsection (3) of the cost of providing  Medicare supplemental coverage for members and their surviving spouses covered under Chapter 19, Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Act who:

(a)  retire after January 1, 1998;

(b)  are at least 65 years of age; and

(c)  elect to receive and apply for this benefit to the program.

(3)  The following percentages apply to the benefit described in Subsections (1) and (2):

(a)  100% if the member has accrued 10 or more years of service credit;

(b)  80% if the member has accrued 8 or more years of service credit;

(c)  60% if the member has accrued 6 or more years of service credit; and

(d)  40% if the member has accrued 4 or more years of service credit.

